Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3014.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 3-101, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 182, O.S.L. 2023 (70 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 3-101), is amended to read as follows:
Section 3-101. A. The State Board of Education shall consist
of seven (7) members. The State Superintendent of Public
Instruction shall be a member and the chairperson of the Board. The
remaining six members shall be appointed by the Governor by and with
the advice and consent of the Senate. Except as otherwise provided
Req. No. 14036 Page 1

for in subsection B of this section, upon assuming office each
Governor shall appoint one member from each congressional district
and one member from the state at large. Each appointment shall be
made to take effect on April 2. The term of each appointed member
shall be four (4) years. Appointed members shall serve until a
successor is appointed. Appointed members shall serve at the
pleasure of the Governor. Upon the occurrence of a vacancy the same
shall be filled by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the
Senate at the next session of the Legislature. The appointment to
fill a vacancy shall be made for the unexpired term.
B. On the effective date of this act, all appointed positions
of the current State Board of Education shall be deemed vacant and
the terms of persons serving on the Board shall be deemed
terminated. The Governor shall make initial appointments pursuant
to the provisions of this subsection within thirty (30) days of the
effective date of this act, with one member appointed from each
congressional district and one member appointed from the state at
large. The appointments shall be subject to confirmation by the
Senate at the next session of the Legislature. The terms for
members appointed pursuant to this subsection shall terminate on
April 2, 2015. Thereafter, members shall be appointed as provided
for in subsection A of this section The Board shall annually elect
from among its members a chair and a vice-chair. No member shall
serve more than two consecutive terms as chair. The chair shall
Req. No. 14036 Page 2

pres ide at all meetings of the Board and shall exercise such powers
and duties as may be prescribed by the Board. In the absence of the
chair, the vice-chair shall preside. The State Superintendent shall
continue to have control and duties as set forth in Section 3-107.1
of this title, but shall not serve as chair or vice-chair of the
Board.
C. No person shall be eligible to be appointed to serve on the
Board unless the person has been awarded a high school diploma or
certificate of high school equivalency. No person shall be
appointed to serve on the Board if the person serves on a board of
education of a school district which is supervised by the Board
pursuant to Section 3-104 of this title. Any member appointed to
the Board shall complete the workshop requirements of a new school
board member pursuant to Section 5-110 of this title within thirteen
(13) months following or preceding the appointment of the member.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the State
Department of Education shall not charge any member of the State
Board of Education a fee for any workshop provided by the Department
for board members pursuant to Section 5-110 of this title and shall
not pay a fee to any organization or institution of higher education
on behalf of a member of the State Board of Education, or reimburse
any member of the Board for a fee paid to any organization or
institution of higher education, for attendance at a workshop or
courses to satisfy the requirements of Section 5-110 of this title.
Req. No. 14036 Page 3

D. Members of the Board shall receive necessary traveling
expenses while in the performance of their duties in accordance with
the State Travel Reimbursement Act.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-14036 SW 01/06/26


















Req. No. 14036 Page 4